Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
TOBACCO RETAILER LICENSURE
SECTION 1. Definitions. As used in sections 1 to 14 of this 2021 Act:
(1) “Governing body of a local public health authority” has the  meaning given that term
in ORS 431.003.
(2) “Inhalant delivery system” has the meaning given that term in ORS 431A.175.
(3) “Local public health authority” has the meaning given that term in ORS 431.003.
(4) “Premises” means the  real property on which a business that makes retail sales of
tobacco products or inhalant delivery systems is located.
(5) “Tobacco products” has the meaning given that term in ORS 431A.175.
SECTION 2.
Purpose. The purpose of sections 1 to 14 of this 2021 Act is to  improve
enforcement of local ordinances and rules, state laws and rules and federal laws  and regu-
lations that govern the retail sale of tobacco products and inhalant delivery systems.
SECTION 3. Licensure requirement.  A person may not make  a retail sale of a tobacco
product or an inhalant delivery system at or from a premises located in this state  unless the
person sells the tobacco product or inhalant delivery  system at or from a premises licensed
or otherwise authorized under section 5 or 18 of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 4. Premises to which Act does not apply. Notwithstanding section 3  of this
2021 Act, sections 1 to 14 of this 2021 Act do not apply to a person making  a retail sale of
an inhalant delivery system at  a medical marijuana dispensary registered under ORS
475B.858 or at a premises for which a license has been issued under ORS  475B.105, unless the
person makes a retail sale of an inhalant delivery system that contains nicotine.
SECTION 5. Licensure. (1) Except as provided in subsection (8) of this section,  the De-
partment of Revenue shall issue licenses to, and annually renew licenses for, a  person that
makes retail sales of tobacco products or inhalant delivery systems at qualified premises.
(2) To be qualified for licensure under this section, a premises:
(a) Must be a premises that is fixed and permanent;
(b) May not be located in an area that is zoned exclusively for residential use; and
Enrolled Senate Bill 587 (SB 587-B) Page 1
(c) Must meet any qualification  for engaging in the retail sale of tobacco products and
inhalant delivery systems enacted as an ordinance by the governing body of a local public
health authority under section 17 of this 2021 Act, provided that the department has know-
ledge of the qualification pursuant to an agreement entered into  under section 13 of this 2021
Act.
(3) For the purpose of licensing premises  under this section, the department shall adopt
rules establishing:
(a) Procedures for applying for and renewing licenses; and
(b) Licensure application, issuance and renewal fees.
(4) An application submitted under this section and information related  to applying for
or renewing a license under this  section is confidential and not subject to public disclosure
under ORS 192.311 to 192.478. However, the department may share an application submitted
under this section and information related to applying  for or renewing a license under this
section with the Department of Justice, the Oregon Health Authority or a  local public health
authority.
(5) The Department of Revenue shall publish a list that includes the name  of each person
to which a license has been issued under this  section, the address of each premises for which
a license has been issued under this section and any other  information that the department
determines is relevant to the public with  respect to the retail sale of tobacco products and
inhalant delivery systems.
(6) Fees established under subsection (3)(b)  of this section must be reasonably calculated
to cover but not exceed the costs incurred by the department in administering sections 1 to
14 of this 2021 Act.
(7) All moneys collected under this section shall  be deposited in the suspense account
described in section 10 of this 2021 Act.
(8) The department may not require a person that makes retail sales of tobacco  products
or inhalant delivery systems to obtain a license under this section if the  person holds a li-
cense or other authorization issued by a city or  local public health authority pursuant to
section 18 of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 6.
Proof of licensure.  A person to which a license or other  authorization has
been issued under section 5 or 18 of  this 2021 Act must post proof of licensure or other au-
thorization in a clear and conspicuous  place at the premises for which the license or other
authorization has been issued.
SECTION 7. Revocation, suspension, refusal to issue or renew. (1) The Department of
Revenue may  revoke, suspend or refuse to issue or renew a license issued under section 5
of this 2021 Act if the person that holds  or seeks the license, an individual who participates
in the management of  the premises for which the license has been or would be issued or an
individual who is employed for the purpose of making retail sales at the premises:
(a) Violates sections  1 to 14 of this 2021 Act, a rule adopted under sections 1 to 14 of this
2021 Act or any other state law or rule or federal law or regulation that governs  the retail
sale of tobacco products or inhalant delivery systems or state taxation;
(b) Violates an ordinance enacted by the governing  body of a local public health authority
or a rule adopted by a local public health authority that governs the retail sale of tobacco
products or inhalant delivery systems; or
(c) Makes a false statement to the department.
(2) The department may only revoke, suspend or refuse  to issue or renew a license pur-
suant to subsection (1)(b) of this section if a local public health authority:
(a) Has provided the person that holds or seeks the license, the individual  who partic-
ipates in the management of the premises for which the license has  been or would be issued
or the individual who is employed for the purpose of making retail  sales at the premises with
a process for contesting the violation that is substantially similar to the process provided
under ORS 183.413 to 183.470; and
Enrolled Senate Bill 587 (SB 587-B) Page 2
(b) Provides the department  with a final order establishing that the person or individual
is in violation of an ordinance that is  substantially similar to the requirements for a final
order under ORS 183.470.
(3) Except as provided by  state tax law or as otherwise identified by the department by
rule or order, a decision by the department to revoke, suspend or  refuse to issue or renew
a license under this section may be appealed as a contested case under ORS chapter 183.
(4) The department shall adopt rules to provide that, subject to subsection (2)  of this
section, a license issued under section 5 of this 2021 Act must be suspended  for an amount
of time established by the department by rule if a person  described in subsection (1) of this
section is found to have committed an act described in subsection (1)(a) to (c) of this section
three or more times.
SECTION 8. Civil penalty. (1) The Department of Revenue may impose a civil  penalty
against a person that holds or seeks a license issued under section 5 of this 2021 Act  if the
person that holds or seeks the license, an individual who participates  in the management of
the premises for which the license has been or would be issued or an individual who is  em-
ployed for the purpose of making retail sales at the premises:
(a) Violates sections  1 to 14 of this 2021 Act, a rule adopted under sections 1 to 14 of this
2021 Act or any other state law or rule or federal law or regulation that governs  the retail
sale of tobacco products or inhalant delivery systems or state taxation; or
(b) Makes a false statement to the department.
(2) A civil penalty imposed under this section may not exceed $1,000 per violation.
(3) Amounts collected by the department under this section shall  be deposited in the
General Fund.
(4) Except as provided by state tax law or as otherwise identified  by the department by
rule or order,  an imposition of a civil penalty under this section may be appealed as a con-
tested case under ORS chapter 183.
(5) If  a civil penalty is imposed under this section, a civil penalty may not be imposed for
the commission of the same act under ORS 431A.178 or pursuant to  an ordinance or rule
adopted under section 17 of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 9.
Seizure and forfeiture of contraband tobacco products and contraband
inhalant delivery systems.  (1)  For purposes of this section, a tobacco product or inhalant
delivery system  sold or held for sale at or from a premises for which a license has not been
issued under section 5 of this 2021 Act is a contraband tobacco product or contraband
inhalant delivery system.
(2) A contraband tobacco product or  contraband inhalant delivery system found by the
Department of  Revenue or a law enforcement agency may be seized immediately by the de-
partment or agency and is subject to forfeiture. If seized  and forfeited under this section,
the contraband tobacco product or the contraband inhalant  delivery system must be de-
stroyed.
(3) Notwithstanding ORS 305.280 or 323.416, a  seizure and forfeiture made under this
section may be appealed to the magistrate division of the Oregon Tax  Court within 30 days
of the date of the seizure in the manner provided in ORS 305.404 to 305.560.
SECTION 10.
Suspense account for administration  and enforcement.  (1) Amounts col-
lected by the Department of Revenue under section 5 of this  2021 Act shall be paid to the
State Treasurer to be held in a suspense account established under ORS 293.445.
(2) From moneys held in the suspense account, the department may pay  expenses for the
administration and enforcement of  sections 1 to 14 of this 2021 Act and the collection of fees
under sections 1 to 14 of this 2021 Act. Refunds, including refunds of erroneous overpay-
ments or refunds of other moneys received in which the department has no legal  interest,
shall be paid out of the suspense account.
(3) Amounts necessary to make payments as described in subsection (2) of this  section
are continuously appropriated to the department from the suspense account.
Enrolled Senate Bill 587 (SB 587-B) Page 3
SECTION 11. Rules. The Department of Revenue may adopt rules necessary for the ef-
fective administration of sections 1 to 14 of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 12. Fees. The Oregon Health Authority shall adopt  by rule fees necessary to
pay the expenses of administering and enforcing ORS 431A.175 and 431A.183 and  section 17
of this 2021 Act. Pursuant to an agreement entered into under section 13 of this 2021 Act,
the Department of Revenue shall  collect the fee moneys for, and transfer the fee moneys to,
the authority. Moneys transferred to the authority under this section  must be deposited in
the Oregon Health Authority Fund established under ORS 413.101. Moneys deposited in the
fund under this section are continuously appropriated to the authority for  the purposes of
administering and enforcing ORS 431A.175 and 431A.183 and section 17 of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 13.
Intergovernmental agreements. (1) The Department of  Revenue and the
Oregon Health Authority shall:
(a) Share information necessary for the effective administration  of sections 1 to 14 and
17 of this 2021 Act and ORS 431A.175 and 431A.183; and
(b) Enter into an agreement for purposes of collecting fee  moneys for the authority
pursuant to section 12 of this 2021  Act from each retailer of tobacco products or inhalant
delivery systems at the same time that the department collects fee moneys  from the retailer
under section 5 of this 2021 Act,  and transferring the fee moneys collected pursuant to sec-
tion 12 of this  2021 Act to the authority for deposit in the Oregon Health Authority Fund
established under ORS 413.101.
(2) The department and each local public health authority that does  not require licensure
or other authorization pursuant to section 18 of this 2021 Act shall:
(a) Share information necessary for the effective  administration of sections 1 to 14 and
17 of this 2021 Act; and
(b) Enter into an agreement  for purposes of collecting any fee moneys for the local public
health authority  pursuant to section 17 of this 2021 Act from each retailer of tobacco pro-
ducts or inhalant delivery  systems located within the area over which the local public health
authority has jurisdiction at the same time that the department  collects fee moneys from
the retailer under section 5 of this 2021 Act,  and transferring the fee moneys collected pur-
suant to section 17 of this 2021 Act to the local public health authority for deposit in a fund
of the local public health authority.
(3) The department and each city or local public health  authority that requires licensure
or other authorization pursuant to section 18 of this 2021 Act shall:
(a) Share information necessary for the effective administration  of the licensure or other
authorization pursuant to section 18 of this 2021 Act and ORS 323.005 to  323.482, 323.500 to
323.645 and 323.700 to 323.730 and any rules adopted under ORS 323.005 to 323.482, 323.500 to
323.645 or 323.700 to 323.730; and
(b) Enter into an agreement under which the city or  local public health authority agrees
to enforce standards described in section 17 (2)(a)  of this 2021 Act against persons licensed
or otherwise authorized by  the city or local public health authority under section 18 of this
2021 Act, including through revocation of the license or  other authorization of a person that
violates the  standards or ORS 323.005 to 323.482, 323.500 to 323.645 and 323.700 to 323.730 and
any rules adopted under ORS 323.005 to 323.482, 323.500 to 323.645 or 323.700 to 323.730.
(4) The Oregon Health Authority and  each local public health authority shall share in-
formation necessary for the effective administration of sections 1 to 14 and 17 of this 2021
Act and ORS 431A.175 and 431A.183.
(5) Notwithstanding the  confidentiality provisions of ORS 323.403 and 323.595, the de-
partment may disclose  information received under ORS 323.005 to 323.482 and 323.500 to
323.645 to a city or local public  health authority to the extent the department deems neces-
sary.
SECTION 14.
Suspense account for fee money transfers. (1) Amounts collected by the
Department of Revenue pursuant to agreements entered into under  section 13 of this 2021
Enrolled Senate Bill 587 (SB 587-B) Page 4
Act shall be paid to the State Treasurer to be  held in a suspense account established under
ORS 293.445.
(2) From moneys held  in the suspense account, the department shall make transfers to
the Oregon Health Authority and local public health authorities as required by  section 13 of
this 2021 Act.
(3) Amounts necessary to make transfers  as described in subsection (2) of this section
are continuously appropriated to the department from the suspense account.
STATE PUBLIC HEALTH AND SAFETY LAWS
SECTION 15.  ORS 431A.178 is amended to read:
431A.178. [(1) The Oregon Health Authority may impose a civil penalty for each violation of  ORS
431A.175. A civil penalty imposed under this section may not be less than $250 or more than $1,000. ]
(1) The Oregon Health Authority may impose a civil penalty against a person  that en-
gages in the wholesale or  retail sale of tobacco products or inhalant delivery systems, as
those terms are defined in ORS 431A.175, if the person violates:
(a) ORS 431A.175 or a rule adopted under ORS 431A.175; or
(b) A state law or rule or federal law or regulation that governs the wholesale or  retail
sale of tobacco products or inhalant delivery systems for purposes related to  public health
and safety.
(2) A civil penalty imposed under this section may not be more  than $5,000 per violation.
[(2)(a) Amounts collected under subsection (1) of this section shall be deposited  in the Oregon
Health Authority Fund established under ORS 413.101. Except as provided  in paragraph (b) of this
subsection, moneys deposited in the fund under this subsection are continuously appropriated to  the
authority for carrying out the duties, functions and  powers of the authority under ORS 431A.175 and
431A.183.]
[(b) At the end of each biennium, the authority shall transfer the unobligated moneys  collected
under subsection (1) of this section  remaining in the fund to the Tobacco Use Reduction Account es-
tablished under ORS 431A.153. ]
(3) Amounts collected under this section shall be deposited in the General Fund.
(4) If  a civil penalty is imposed under this section, a civil penalty may not be imposed for
the commission of the same act under section 8 or 17 of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 16.
 ORS 431A.183 is amended to read:
431A.183. (1)(a) The Oregon Health Authority may enter into an agreement with federal agencies
to assist the authority in monitoring and enforcing federal laws  and regulations related to tobacco
products or inhalant delivery systems.
(b) The authority may commission employees  of the authority as federal officers for the purpose
of carrying out the duties prescribed under an agreement entered into under  paragraph (a) of this
subsection.
(c) The  authority may adopt rules and take any action necessary to carry out the authority’s
duties as established under an agreement entered into under paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(2)(a) The authority may enter into an agreement with federal,  state and local government
agencies, including federal, state and local law enforcement agencies, to assist the  authority in
carrying out the  authority’s duties under ORS 431A.175 and to conduct random, unannounced in-
spections of wholesalers and retailers of tobacco products or inhalant  delivery systems to ensure
compliance with the laws of this state designed to discourage the use of tobacco products and
inhalant delivery systems by persons under 21  years of age, including ORS 167.750, 167.755, 167.760,
167.765, 167.775, 167.780 and 431A.175.
(b) The authority shall ensure that a retailer is inspected as  described in this subsection
at least once each year. A retailer that is found to be out of compliance  with the laws de-
scribed in paragraph (a) of this  subsection may be reinspected as the authority determines
necessary.
Enrolled Senate Bill 587 (SB 587-B) Page 5
(c) The authority may adopt rules to carry out paragraph (b) of this subsection.
(3)(a) If the authority  enters into an agreement with the Department of State Police under sub-
section (2) of this section, the  department may employ retired state police officers who are active
reserve officers. Service by a retired  state police officer under this paragraph is subject to ORS
238.082.
(b) The department may not use the services  of a retired state police officer to displace an ac-
tive state police member.
(4)(a) The authority may apply for and accept moneys from the federal  government or other
public or private sources and, in accordance with any  federal restrictions or other funding source
restrictions, use those moneys to carry out the duties and functions  related to preventing the use
of tobacco  products or inhalant delivery systems by persons who are not of the minimum age to
purchase tobacco products or inhalant delivery systems.
(b) Moneys received by the authority under paragraph (a) of this subsection shall  be deposited
in the Oregon Health Authority Fund  established under ORS 413.101. Moneys subject to a federal
restriction or other funding source restriction must be accounted  for separately from other fund
moneys.
(5)(a) The authority shall submit a written report each biennium to the Governor and to the
appropriate committee or interim committee of the Legislative Assembly to which matters  of public
health are assigned.
(b) The report submitted under this subsection must contain information describing:
(A) The activities carried out to enforce the  laws listed in subsection (2) of this section during
the previous biennium;
(B) The  extent of success achieved in reducing the availability of tobacco products and inhalant
delivery systems to persons under 21 years of age; and
(C) The strategies to be utilized for enforcing the laws listed in subsection  (2) of this section
during the biennium following the report.
(6) The authority shall adopt rules for conducting random inspections of establishments  that
distribute or sell tobacco products  or inhalant delivery systems. The rules shall provide that in-
spections may take place:
(a) Only in areas open to the public;
(b) Only during the hours that tobacco products or inhalant delivery systems are distributed  or
sold; and
(c) No more frequently than once a month in any single establishment  unless a compliance
problem exists or is suspected.
LOCAL REGULATION
SECTION 17.
Local regulation. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Governing body of a local public health authority” has the meaning given  that term
in ORS 431.003.
(b) “Inhalant delivery system” has the meaning given that term in ORS 431A.175.
(c) “Local public health authority” has the meaning given that term in ORS 431.003.
(d) “Tobacco products” has the meaning given that term in ORS 431A.175.
(2) Each local public health authority may:
(a) Enforce, pursuant to an ordinance enacted by the governing body of the local  public
health authority,  standards for regulating the retail sale of tobacco products and inhalant
delivery systems for purposes related to public health and safety in addition  to the standards
described in paragraph (b) of this subsection, including qualifications for engaging in the re-
tail sale of tobacco products or inhalant delivery systems that are  in addition to the quali-
fications described in section 5 of this 2021 Act;
(b)(A) Administer and  enforce standards established by state law or rule relating to the
regulation of the retail sale of tobacco products and inhalant delivery systems for purposes
Enrolled Senate Bill 587 (SB 587-B) Page 6
related to public health  and safety if the local public health authority and the Oregon Health
Authority enter into an agreement pursuant to ORS 190.110; or
(B) Perform the duties described in this  section in accordance with ORS 431.413 (2) or (3);
and
(c) Use outreach and educational services to provide businesses  that engage in the retail
sale of tobacco products  or inhalant delivery systems with information pertaining to local
ordinances and rules, state laws and  rules and federal laws and regulations regulating the
retail sale of tobacco products and inhalant delivery systems.
(3)(a) A local public health authority may impose on businesses that engage in  the retail
sale of tobacco products or inhalant delivery systems a fee for paying the expenses of activ-
ities described in subsection (2) of this section. Pursuant  to an agreement entered into under
section 13 of this 2021 Act, the Department of Revenue shall collect the fee moneys for,  and
transfer the  fee moneys to, the local public health authority. Moneys transferred to a local
public health authority under this subsection must be deposited in a fund of the local  public
health authority. Moneys deposited  in a fund under this subsection may only be spent by the
local public health authority for the purposes of subsection (2) of this section.
(b) The governing body of a local public health authority may, pursuant to ORS  431.415,
establish a schedule for the fees described in paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(4) A local public health authority may  impose a civil penalty not to exceed $5,000 on a
business that engages in the retail sale of tobacco products or inhalant delivery systems  for
violating a standard described in subsection (2)  of this section. If a civil penalty is imposed
under this section, a civil penalty  may not be imposed for the commission of the same act
under ORS 431A.178 or section 8 of this 2021 Act.
(5) The Oregon Health Authority shall:
(a) Subject to section 18 of this  2021 Act, ensure that state standards established by state
law and rule  regarding the regulation of the retail sale of tobacco products and inhalant de-
livery systems are administered and enforced consistently throughout this state;
(b) Establish a database or other mechanism for collecting information from  local public
health authorities and the general public regarding the regulation of the retail  sale of to-
bacco products and  inhalant delivery systems for purposes related to public health and
safety, including any information  related to complaints about a person that makes retail
sales of tobacco products or inhalant delivery systems;
(c) Provide technical assistance to local public health authorities regarding the regulation
of the retail sale of tobacco products and inhalant delivery systems;
(d) Assess the effectiveness of state and local programs for regulating the retail sale  of
tobacco products and inhalant delivery systems; and
(e) Adopt any rules necessary to implement or administer the provisions of this section.
(6)(a) A city or local public health  authority may not adopt an ordinance that prohibits
a premises that makes retail sales of  tobacco products or inhalant delivery systems from
being located at the same address as a pharmacy, as defined in ORS 689.005.
(b) A city or local public health authority  that, on or before the effective date of this 2021
Act, adopted an ordinance described in paragraph (a) of this subsection may continue to en-
force the ordinance on and after the effective date of this 2021 Act.
(7) Except as provided in section  18 of this 2021 Act, a city or local public health au-
thority may not require a person that makes retail sales of  tobacco products or inhalant
delivery systems to hold a license or other authorization issued  by the city or local public
health authority in addition to the license issued under section 5 of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 18.
Continuity. A city or local public health authority that, on or before Janu-
ary 1, 2021, and pursuant to an ordinance adopted by the governing body of the city  or local
public health authority, enforced  standards described in section 17 (2)(a) of this 2021 Act and
required that a person that makes retail sales of tobacco products  or inhalant delivery sys-
tems in an  area subject to the jurisdiction of the city or local public health authority hold
Enrolled Senate Bill 587 (SB 587-B) Page 7
a license or other authorization issued  by the city or local public health authority may con-
tinue to enforce the standards and require the license or other  authorization on and after
the operative date specified in section 24 of this 2021 Act.
REPEAL
SECTION 19. Repeal. ORS 167.785 and 431A.180 are repealed.
APPLICABILITY
SECTION 20. Applicability. The amendments to ORS 431A.178 by section 15 of this  2021
Act apply to violations for conduct occurring on or after the operative date specified in sec-
tion 24 of this 2021 Act.
FISCAL PROVISIONS
SECTION 21.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2  (4), chapter __, Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled Senate Bill
5537), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including  Miscellaneous Receipts and reimbursements
from federal service agreements, but excluding  lottery funds and federal funds not described
in this section, collected or received by the Department of  Revenue, for the Business Divi-
sion, is increased by $1,174,046, for the implementation of sections 1 to 14 of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 22. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established  by section 2 (1), chapter __, Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled House Bill
5024), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, tobacco tax receipts,
marijuana tax receipts, beer and wine tax receipts, provider taxes and  Medicare receipts, but
excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described  in this section, collected or received
by the Oregon Health Authority, for Health Systems, Health Policy  and Analytics, and Public
Health, is increased by $2,061,726.
CAPTIONS
SECTION 23.
Unit and section  captions. The unit and section captions used in this 2021
Act are provided only for the convenience of the reader and  do not become part of the
statutory law of this state  or express any legislative intent in the enactment of this 2021 Act.
OPERATIVE AND EFFECTIVE DATES
SECTION 24. Operative date. (1) Sections 1 to 14  and 17 of this 2021 Act, the amendments
to ORS 431A.178 and 431A.183 by sections 15 and 16 of this 2021  Act and the repeal of ORS
167.785 and 431A.180 by section 19 of this 2021 Act become operative on January 1, 2022.
(2) The Department of  Revenue, the Oregon Health Authority and local public health
authorities may take any action before the operative date specified in subsection (1) of  this
section that is necessary  to enable the department, the Oregon Health Authority and local
public health authorities to exercise, on and after the operative  date specified in subsection
(1) of  this section, all the duties, functions and powers conferred on the department, the
Oregon Health Authority and local public health authorities by sections 1 to 14 and 17  of this
2021 Act,  the amendments to ORS 431A.178 and 431A.183 by sections 15 and 16 of this 2021
Act and the repeal of ORS 167.785 and 431A.180 by section 19 of this 2021 Act.
Enrolled Senate Bill 587 (SB 587-B) Page 8
SECTION 25. This 2021 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2021
regular session of the Eighty-first Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Passed by Senate June 21, 2021
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House June 24, 2021
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 587 (SB 587-B) Page 9